California statutes. Insurance Code
(c) (1) “Reconstructive surgery” means surgery performed to correct or repair abnormal structures of the body caused by congenital defects, developmental abnormalities,
 trauma, infection, tumors, or disease to do either of the following:

(A) To improve function.

(B) To create a normal appearance, to the extent possible.

(2) As of July 1, 2010, “reconstructive surgery” shall include medically necessary dental or orthodontic services that are an integral part of reconstructive surgery, as defined in paragraph (1), for cleft palate procedures.

(3) For purposes of this section, “cleft palate” means a
 condition that may include cleft palate, cleft lip, or other craniofacial anomalies associated with cleft palate.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an insurer to provide coverage for cosmetic surgery. “Cosmetic surgery” means surgery that is performed to alter or reshape normal structures of the body in order to improve the patient’s appearance.

(e) In interpreting the definition of reconstructive surgery, an insurer may utilize prior authorization and utilization review that may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Denial of the proposed surgery if there is another more appropriate surgical procedure that will be approved for the enrollee.

(2) Denial of the proposed surgery or surgeries if the procedure
 or procedures, in accordance with the standard of care as practiced by physicians specializing in reconstructive surgery, offer only a minimal improvement in the appearance of the enrollee.

(3) Denial of payment for procedures performed without prior authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   (SB 630)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.89.

(a) On and after July 1, 2000, every policy of disability insurance issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall provide coverage for the testing and treatment of phenylketonuria (PKU) under the terms and conditions of the policy.

(b) Coverage for treatment of phenylketonuria (PKU) shall include those formulas and special food products that are part of a diet prescribed by a licensed physician and managed by a health care professional in consultation with a physician who specializes in the treatment of metabolic disease and who participates in or is authorized by the insurer, provided that the diet is deemed medically necessary to avert the development of serious physical or mental disabilities or to promote normal development or function as a consequence of phenylketonuria (PKU).

(c) Coverage pursuant to this section is not required except to the extent that the cost of necessary formulas and special food products exceeds the cost of a normal diet.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Formula” means an enteral product or enteral products for use at home that are prescribed by a physician or nurse practitioner, or ordered by a registered dietician upon referral by a health care provider authorized to prescribe dietary treatments, as medically necessary for the treatment of phenylketonuria (PKU).

(2) “Special food product” means a food product that is both of the following:

(A) Prescribed by a physician or nurse practitioner for the treatment of phenylketonuria (PKU) and is consistent with the recommendations and best practices of qualified health professionals with expertise germane to, and experience in the treatment and care of, phenylketonuria (PKU). It does not include a food that is naturally low in protein, but may include a food product that is specially formulated to have less than one gram of protein per serving.

(B) Used in place of normal food products, such as grocery store foods, used by the general population.

(e) This section shall not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance, except that for accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity coverage, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or contract. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 541, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.9.

On and after January 1, 1980, every group policy of disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses on a group basis, and which offers maternity coverage in such groups, shall also offer coverage for prenatal diagnosis of genetic disorders of the fetus by means of diagnostic procedures in cases of high-risk pregnancy. Such coverage shall be offered under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the insurer and the group policyholder. Every group policy of disability insurance shall communicate the availability of such coverage to all group policyholders and to all groups with whom they are negotiating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.91.

(a) On or after January 1, 2009, every insurer that issues, amends, or renews an individual or group policy of health insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall provide coverage for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) testing, regardless of whether the testing is related to a primary diagnosis.

(b) It shall remain within the sole discretion of the health insurer as to the provider of the testing with which it chooses to contract. Reimbursement shall be provided according to the respective principles and policies of the health insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 631, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.10.

(a) Every disability insurer transacting business in this state shall, on or after January 1, 1979, make available and offer to include in every group disability policy providing hospital, medical or surgical expense benefits payable on an expense incurred basis, to be delivered or issued for delivery in this state, benefits for home health care as set forth in this section provided by a licensed home health agency subject to the right of the group policyholder to reject the benefits or to select any alternative level of benefits as may be offered by the insurer.

In rural areas where there are no licensed health agencies or in which the supply of home health agency services does not meet the needs of the community, the services of visiting nurses, if available, may be substituted for the services of the home health agency, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in subdivision (c).

(b) Every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan containing hospital, medical, or surgical expense benefits or service benefits delivered on or after January 1, 1979, shall make available and offer to include benefits for home health care as set forth in this section provided by a licensed home health agency subject to the right of the employer or the employee organization to reject the benefits or accept any alternative level of benefits as may be offered by the self-insured welfare benefit plan.

In rural areas where there are no licensed health agencies or in which the supply of home health agency services does not meet the needs of the community, the services of visiting nurses, if available, may be substituted for the services of the home health agency, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Home health care” means the continued care and treatment of an insured person who is under the direct care and supervision of a physician but only if (i) continued hospitalization would have been required if home health care were not provided, (ii) the home health treatment plan is established and approved by a physician within 14 days after an inpatient hospital confinement has ended and such treatment plan is for the same or related condition for which the insured person was hospitalized, and (iii) home health care commences within 14 days after the hospital confinement has ended. “Home health services” consist of, but shall not be limited to, the following: (i) part-time or intermittent skilled nursing services provided by a registered nurse or licensed vocational nurse; (ii) part-time or intermitent home health aide services which provide supportive services in the home under the supervision of a registered nurse or a physical, speech or occupational therapist; (iii) physical, occupational or speech therapy; and (iv) medical supplies, drugs and medicines prescribed by a physician and related pharmaceutical services, and laboratory services to the extent such charges or costs would have been covered under the policy if the insured person had remained in the hospital.

(2) “Home health agency” means a public or private agency or organization licensed by the State Department of Health Services in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The policy may contain a limitation on the number of home health visits for which benefits are payable, but the number of such visits shall not be less than 100 in any calendar year or in any continuous 12-month period for each person covered under the policy. Except for a home health aide, each visit by a representative of a home health agency shall be considered as one home health visit. A visit of four hours or less by a home health aide shall be considered as one home health visit.

(e) Home health care benefits may be subject to an annual deductible of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each person covered under a policy, and may be subject to a coinsurance provision which provides coverage of not less than 80 percent of the reasonable charges for such services.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude an insurer or plan offering other health care benefits provided in the home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.11.

(a) No insurer shall deny a claim under a group disability policy for hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric services for the sole reason that the individual served was confined in a city or county jail as a prisoner, or was a juvenile detained in any facility if such individual is otherwise entitled to benefits under such group disability policy and incurs expense for the services so provided during confinement. This provision shall apply to any group disability policy entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 1980, whether or not such policy contains any provision terminating benefits under such policy upon an individual’s confinement in a city or county jail or juvenile detention facility.

(b) No self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall deny a claim under a plan for hospital, medical, surgical, dental, or optometric services for the reason that the individual served was confined in a city or county jail as a prisoner, or was a juvenile detained in any facility, if such individual is otherwise entitled to benefits under such plan and incurs expense for the services so provided during confinement. This provision shall apply to any self-insured employee welfare benefit plan entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 1980, whether or not such plan contains any provision terminating benefits under such plan upon an individual’s confinement in a city or county jail or juvenile detention facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.12.

Every health insurer, including those insurers that contract for alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133, and every self-insured employee welfare benefit plan that will affect the choice of physician, hospital, or other health care providers shall include within its disclosure form and within its evidence or certificate of coverage a statement clearly describing how participation in the policy or plan may affect the choice of physician, hospital, or other health care providers, and describing the nature and extent of the financial liability that is, or that may be, incurred by the insured, enrollee, or covered dependents if care is furnished by a provider that does not have a contract with the insurer or plan to provide service at alternative rates of payment pursuant to Section 10133. The form shall clearly inform prospective insureds or plan enrollees that participation in the policy or plan will affect the person’s choice in this regard by placing the following statement in a conspicuous place on all material required to be given to prospective insureds or plan enrollees including promotional and descriptive material, disclosure forms, and certificates and evidences of coverage:PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION SO YOU WILL KNOW FROM WHOM OR WHAT GROUP OF PROVIDERS HEALTH CARE MAY BE OBTAINED

It is not the intent of this section to require that the names of individual health care providers be enumerated to prospective insureds or enrollees.

If a health insurer providing coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses provides a list of facilities to patients or contracting providers, the insurer shall include within the provider listing a notification that insureds or enrollees may contact the insurer in order to obtain a list of the facilities with which the health insurer is contracting for subacute care and/or transitional inpatient care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 441, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.13.

(a) Every insurer issuing group or individual policies of health insurance that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, including those telehealth services covered by the insurer as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, shall reimburse a complete claim or portion thereof, whether in state or out of state, for those expenses as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 calendar days after receipt of the claim by the insurer, unless the insurer is contesting or denying the claim or a portion thereof, in which case the claimant shall be notified, in writing, that the claim is contested or denied, within 30 calendar days after receipt of the claim by the insurer. The notice that a claim is being contested or denied shall identify the portion of the claim that is contested or
 denied and the specific reasons including for each reason the factual and legal basis known at that time by the insurer for contesting or denying the claim. If the reason is based solely on facts or solely on law, the insurer is required to provide only the factual or the legal basis for its reason for contesting or denying the claim. The insurer shall provide a copy of the notice to each insured who received services pursuant to the claim that was contested or denied and to the insured’s health care provider that provided the services at issue. The notice shall advise the provider who submitted the claim on behalf of the insured or pursuant to a contract for alternative rates of payment and the insured that either may seek review by the department of a claim that the insurer contested or denied, and the notice shall include the address, internet website address, and telephone number of the unit within the department that performs this review function. The notice to the provider may be included on either the
 explanation of benefits or remittance advice and shall also contain a statement advising the provider of its right to enter into the dispute resolution process described in Section 10123.137. The notice to the insured may also be included on the explanation of benefits.

(b) If an uncontested claim is not reimbursed by delivery to the claimant’s address of record within 30 calendar days after receipt, interest shall accrue at the rate of 15 percent per annum beginning with the first calendar day after the 30-calendar-day period. An insurer shall automatically include in its payment of the claim all interest that has accrued pursuant to this section without requiring the claimant to submit a request for the interest amount. An insurer failing to comply with this requirement shall pay the claimant a fee of the greater of an additional fifteen dollars ($15) or 10 percent of the accrued interest.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, a claim, or portion thereof, is reasonably contested when the insurer has not received a completed claim and all information necessary to determine payer liability for the claim, or has not been granted reasonable access to information concerning provider services. Information necessary to determine liability for the claims includes, but is not limited to, reports of investigations concerning fraud and misrepresentation, and necessary consents, releases, and assignments, a claim on appeal, or other information necessary for the insurer to determine the medical necessity for the health care services provided to the claimant. An insurer may not contest a complete claim that is consistent with an approved prior authorization request if the prior authorization approval has been provided in the appropriate field on the claim.

(2) If an insurer has received all of the
 information necessary to determine payer liability for a contested claim and has not reimbursed a claim determined to be payable within 30 calendar days of receipt of that information, interest shall accrue and be payable at a rate of 15 percent per annum beginning with the first calendar day after the 30-calendar-day period.

(d) The obligation of the insurer to comply with this section shall not be deemed to be waived when the insurer requires its contracting entities to pay claims for covered services.

(e) (1) The department may issue guidance and regulations relating to this section. The guidance and regulations shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until December 31, 2027.

(2) After January 1, 2028, the department may issue regulations relating to this section subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act ((Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) until December 31, 2030.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 763, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 19.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.131.

(a) An insurer shall pay a provider for duplicating all information it requests in connection with a contested claim, and for patient records, as follows:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the insurer shall pay the provider for copying twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page, or fifty cents ($0.50) per page for records that are copied from microfilm.

(2) The insurer shall pay the provider all reasonable costs, not exceeding actual costs, incurred by the provider in providing the insurer copies of X-rays, or tracings derived from electrocardiography, electroencephalography, or electromyography.

(b) No insurer subject to this section shall request information that is not reasonably necessary to determine liability for payment of a claim.

(c) The obligation of the insurer to comply with this section shall not be deemed to be waived when the insurer requires its contracting entities to pay claims for covered services.

(d) This section shall not apply to contractual arrangements between an insurer and its agent, an insurer and a provider, or a provider and its agent for the costs associated with the provision of duplication services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.132.

(a) Every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and that reviews and approves the medical necessity or appropriateness of requests by providers prior to, or concurrently with, the provision of health care services to insureds, shall prominently indicate on each insured’s identification card whether a separate telephone number must be called to verify eligibility for benefits and coverage.

(b) A written notice shall accompany the initial mailing of the insured’s identification card modified pursuant to subdivision (a). The notice shall indicate that the insured’s identification card includes a telephone number that may be used to verify eligibility for benefits and coverage. The notice shall also inform the insured that review and approval of a health care service based on medical necessity or appropriateness does not constitute eligibility for benefits and coverage pursuant to the policy or contract.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10123.135 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 88) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 241, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.135.

(a) Every disability insurer, or an entity with which it contracts for services that include utilization review or utilization management functions, that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses and that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently reviews and approves, modifies, delays, or denies, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds, or that delegates these functions to medical groups or independent practice associations or to other contracting providers, shall comply with this section.

(b) A disability insurer that is subject to this section, or
 any entity with which an insurer contracts for services that include
 utilization review or utilization management functions, shall have written policies and procedures establishing the process by which the insurer prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently reviews and approves, modifies, delays, or denies, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests by providers of health care services for insureds. These policies and procedures shall ensure that decisions based on the medical necessity of proposed health care services are consistent with criteria or guidelines that are supported by clinical principles and processes. These criteria and guidelines shall be developed pursuant to subdivision (f). These policies and procedures, and a description of the process by which an insurer, or an entity with which an insurer contracts for services that include utilization review or utilization management functions, reviews and approves, modifies,
 delays, or denies requests by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds, shall be filed with the commissioner, and shall be disclosed by the insurer to insureds and providers upon request, and by the insurer to the public upon request.

(c) If the number of insureds covered under health benefit plans in this state that are issued by an insurer subject to this section constitute at least 50 percent of the number of insureds covered under health benefit plans issued nationwide by that insurer, the insurer shall employ or designate a medical director who holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine in this state issued pursuant to Section 2050 of the Business and Professions Code or the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the insurer may employ a clinical director licensed
 in California whose scope of practice under California law includes the right to independently perform all those services covered by the insurer. The medical director or clinical director shall ensure that the process by which the insurer reviews and approves, modifies, delays, or denies, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds, complies with the requirements of this section. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as restricting the existing authority of the Medical Board of California.

(d) If an insurer subject to this section, or individuals under contract to the insurer to review requests by providers, approve the provider’s request pursuant to subdivision (b), the decision shall be communicated to the
 provider pursuant to subdivision (h).

(e) An individual, other than a licensed physician or a licensed health care professional who is competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the health care services requested by the provider, may not deny or modify requests for authorization of health care services for an insured for reasons of medical necessity. The decision of the physician or other health care provider shall be communicated to the provider and the insured pursuant to subdivision (h).

(f) (1) An insurer shall disclose, or provide for the disclosure, to the commissioner and to network providers, the process the insurer, its contracting provider groups, or any entity with which it contracts for services that include utilization review or
 utilization management functions, uses to authorize, delay, modify, or deny health care services under the benefits provided by the insurance contract, including coverage for subacute care, transitional inpatient care, or care provided in skilled nursing facilities. An insurer shall also disclose those processes to policyholders or persons designated by a policyholder, or to any other person or organization, upon request.

(2) The criteria or guidelines used by an insurer, or an entity with which an insurer contracts for utilization review or utilization management functions, to determine whether to authorize, modify, delay, or deny health care services, shall comply with all of the following:

(A) Be developed with involvement from actively practicing health care
 providers.

(B) Be consistent with sound clinical principles and processes.

(C) Be evaluated, and updated if necessary, at least annually.

(D) If used as the basis of a decision to modify, delay, or deny services in a specified case under review, be disclosed to the provider and the policyholder in that specified case.

(E) Be available to the public upon request. An insurer shall only be required to disclose the criteria or guidelines for the specific procedures or conditions requested. An insurer may charge reasonable fees to cover administrative expenses related to disclosing criteria or guidelines pursuant to this paragraph that are limited to copying and postage
 costs. The insurer may also make the criteria or guidelines available through electronic communication means.

(3) The disclosure required by subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) shall be accompanied by the following notice: “The materials provided to you are guidelines used by this insurer to authorize, modify, or deny health care benefits for persons with similar illnesses or conditions. Specific care and treatment may vary depending on individual need and the benefits covered under your insurance contract.”

(g) If an insurer subject to this section requests medical information from providers in order to determine whether to approve, modify, or deny requests for authorization, the insurer shall request only the information reasonably necessary to make the determination.

(h) In determining whether to approve, modify, or deny requests by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, every insurer subject to this section shall meet the following requirements:

(1) Decisions to approve, modify, or deny, based on medical necessity, requests by providers prior to, or concurrent with, the provision of health care services to insureds that do not meet the requirements for the time period for review required by paragraph (2), shall be made in a timely fashion appropriate for the nature of the insured’s condition, not to exceed five business days from the insurer’s receipt of the information reasonably necessary and requested by the insurer to make
 the determination. In cases where the review is retrospective, the decision shall be communicated to the individual who received services, or to the individual’s designee, within 30 days of the receipt of information that is reasonably necessary to make this determination, and shall be communicated to the provider in a manner that is consistent with current law. For purposes of this section, retrospective reviews shall be for care rendered on or after January 1, 2000.

(2) When the insured’s condition is such that the insured faces an imminent and serious threat to the insured’s health, including, but not limited to, the potential loss of life, limb, or other major bodily function, or the normal timeframe for the decisionmaking process, as described in paragraph (1), would be detrimental to the insured’s life or health or could jeopardize
 the insured’s ability to regain maximum function, decisions to approve, modify, or deny requests by providers prior to, or concurrent with, the provision of health care services to insureds shall be made in a timely fashion, appropriate for the nature of the insured’s condition, but not to exceed 72 hours or, if shorter, the period of time required under Section 2719 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-19) and any subsequent rules or regulations issued thereunder, after the insurer’s receipt of the information reasonably necessary and requested by the insurer to make the determination.

(3) Decisions to approve, modify, or deny requests by providers for authorization prior to, or concurrent with, the provision of health care services to insureds shall be communicated to the requesting provider within 24 hours of the
 decision. Except for concurrent review decisions pertaining to care that is underway, which shall be communicated to the insured’s treating provider within 24 hours, decisions resulting in denial, delay, or modification of all or part of the requested health care service shall be communicated to the insured in writing within two business days of the decision. In the case of concurrent review, care shall not be discontinued until the insured’s treating provider has been notified of the insurer’s decision and a care plan has been agreed upon by the treating provider that is appropriate for the medical needs of that patient.

(4) Communications regarding decisions to approve requests by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds shall specify the specific health care service
 approved. Responses regarding decisions to deny, delay, or modify health care services requested by providers prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insureds shall be communicated to insureds in writing, and to providers initially by telephone or facsimile, except with regard to decisions rendered retrospectively, and then in writing, and shall include a clear and concise explanation of the reasons for the insurer’s decision, a description of the criteria or guidelines used, and the clinical reasons for the decisions regarding medical necessity. Any written communication to a physician or other health care provider of a denial, delay, or modification or a request shall include the name and telephone number of the health care professional responsible for the denial, delay, or modification. The telephone number provided shall be a direct number or an
 extension, to allow the physician or health care provider easily to contact the professional responsible for the denial, delay, or modification. Responses shall also include information as to how the provider or the insured may file an appeal with the insurer or seek department review under the unfair practices provisions of Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(5) If the insurer cannot make a decision to approve, modify, or deny the request for authorization within the timeframes specified in paragraph (1) or (2) because the insurer is not in receipt of all of the information reasonably necessary and requested, or because the insurer requires consultation by an expert reviewer, or because the insurer has asked that an additional examination or test be
 performed upon the insured, provided that the examination or test is reasonable and consistent with good medical practice, the insurer shall, immediately upon the expiration of the timeframe specified in paragraph (1) or (2), or as soon as the insurer becomes aware that it will not meet the timeframe, whichever occurs first, notify the provider and the insured, in writing, that the insurer cannot make a decision to approve, modify, or deny the request for authorization within the required timeframe, and specify the information requested but not received, or the expert reviewer to be consulted, or the additional examinations or tests required. The insurer shall also notify the provider and enrollee of the anticipated date on which a decision may be rendered. Upon receipt of all information reasonably necessary and requested by the insurer, the insurer shall approve, modify, or deny the request for authorization
 within the timeframes specified in paragraph (1) or (2), whichever applies.

(6) If the commissioner determines that an insurer has failed to meet any of the timeframes in this section, or has failed to meet any other requirement of this section, the commissioner may assess, by order, administrative penalties for each failure. A proceeding for the issuance of an order assessing administrative penalties shall be subject to appropriate notice to, and an opportunity for a hearing with regard to, the person affected. The administrative penalties shall not be deemed an exclusive remedy for the commissioner. These penalties shall be paid to the Insurance Fund.

(i) Every insurer subject to this section shall maintain telephone access for providers to request authorization for health care services.

(j) (1) A disability insurer, including a specialized health insurer that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for the purpose of utilization review or utilization management functions, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, or that contracts with or otherwise works through an entity that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for the purpose of utilization review or utilization management functions, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, shall comply with this section and shall ensure all of the following:

(A) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool bases its determination on the following information, as applicable:

(i) An insured’s medical or other clinical history.

(ii) Individual clinical circumstances as presented by the requesting provider.

(iii) Other relevant clinical information contained in the insured’s medical or other clinical record.

(B) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not base its determination solely on a group dataset.

(C) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool’s criteria and guidelines complies with this chapter and applicable state and federal law.

(D) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
 supplant health care provider decisionmaking.

(E) The use of the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not discriminate, directly or indirectly, against insureds in violation of state or federal law.

(F) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is fairly and equitably applied, including in accordance with any applicable regulations and guidance issued by the federal Department of Health and Human Services.

(G) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is open to inspection for audit or compliance reviews by the department pursuant to applicable state and federal law.

(H) Disclosures
 pertaining to the use and oversight of the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool are contained in the written policies and procedures, as required by subdivision (b).

(I) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool’s performance, use, and outcomes are periodically reviewed and revised to maximize accuracy and reliability.

(J) Patient data is not used beyond its intended and stated purpose, consistent with the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code) and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191), as applicable.

(K) The artificial intelligence, algorithm,
 or other software tool does not directly or indirectly cause harm to the insured.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool shall not deny, delay, or modify health care services based, in whole or in part, on medical necessity. A determination of medical necessity shall be made only by a licensed physician or licensed health care professional competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the health care services requested by the provider, as provided in subdivision (e), by reviewing and
 considering the requesting provider’s recommendation, the insured’s medical or other clinical history, as applicable, and individual clinical circumstances.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(4) This subdivision shall apply to utilization review or utilization management functions that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently review requests for covered health care services.

(5) A disability insurer subject to this subdivision shall comply with
 applicable federal rules and guidance issued by the federal Department of Health and Human Services regarding the use of artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tools. The department may issue guidance to implement this paragraph within one year of the adoption of federal rules or the issuance of guidance by the federal Department of Health and Human Services regarding the use of artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tools. Such guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(6) For purposes of implementing this subdivision, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.
